Nevada, session 83, AB271.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
Sec. 3. “Ballot marking device” means a device which allows
a registered voter to mark a paper ballot which is subsequently
counted on an electronic tabulator, counting device or computer.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 293.016 to 293.121,
inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. Chapter 293B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Any equipment used for voting, ballot processing or ballot
counting, including, without limitation, automatic tabulating
equipment and programs, ballot marking devices, electronic
devices used pursuant to NRS 293.269927 or 293C.26327 to check
signatures on mail ballots, mechanical recording devices,
mechanical voting systems and voting machines must not use
artificial intelligence.
Sec. 6. Chapter 294A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 7, 8 and 9 of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. Any published material that expressly advocates
the election or defeat of a candidate for a state or local office or
the passage or defeat of a ballot question in an election and is
generated through the use of artificial intelligence must include
the following disclosure on the published material:

This communication was generated using artificial
intelligence.

2. A person who willfully violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
-
*AB271*

– 3 –
Sec. 8. 1. Any published material that expressly advocates
the election or defeat of a candidate or the passage or defeat of a
ballot question in an election and includes a materially deceptive
depiction of the candidate must include the following disclosure
on the published material:

This material has been manipulated to include a materially
deceptive depiction of a candidate.

2. For the purposes of subsection 1, published material
includes a materially deceptive depiction of a candidate if:
(a) The published material has been manipulated to change
the physical appearance of a candidate or depict a candidate
performing an act that did not occur; or
(b) The published material includes an image of the candidate
that has been altered to change the saturation, brightness,
contrast, color or other visible quality of an image of the
candidate.
3. A person who willfully violates any provision of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 9. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person shall not, within 90 days of an election at which a
candidate will appear on the ballot, distribute synthetic media that
the person knows or should know contains a deceptive and
fraudulent deepfake of the candidate.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any of the
following:
(a) Any person who publishes synthetic media that includes a
clear and conspicuous disclaimer that the synthetic media includes
a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake of a candidate.
(b) A radio broadcasting station, a television broadcasting
station or a cable or satellite television operator that:
(1) Broadcasts synthetic media as part of a bona fide
newscast, interview, documentary or coverage of a bona fide news
event; and
(2) Indicates during the newscast, interview, documentary
or coverage of a bona fide news event that there are questions
about the authenticity of the image, audio recording or video
recording of the candidate in the synthetic media.
(c) Any Internet website that routinely carries news and
commentary of general interest or any regularly published
newspaper, magazine or other periodical of general circulation
that includes a disclosure on synthetic media that the image, audio
or visual recording of the candidate does not accurately represent
the speech or conduct of the candidate.
-
*AB271*

– 4 –
(d) Any person who publishes synthetic media as part of
entertainment as a satire or parody.
(e) Any interactive computer service provider, cloud service
provider or Internet service provider.
3. Any candidate who is depicted in synthetic media that
contains a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake of the candidate may
seek an injunction or other equitable relief in district court.
4. Any person who violates a provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Deceptive and fraudulent deepfake” means synthetic
media that:
(1) Depicts a candidate with the intent to injure the
reputation of the candidate or otherwise deceive a voter; and
(2) Does at least one of the following:
(I) Appears to a reasonable person to depict a real
natural person saying or doing something that did not occur in
reality; or
(II) Provides a reasonable person with a fundamentally
different understanding or impression of an appearance, action or
speech than a reasonable person would have from the unaltered,
original version of the appearance, action or speech.
(b) “Generative adversarial network” means a framework for
machine learning that uses adversarial training towards the
development of generative artificial intelligence.
(c) “Generative artificial intelligence” means a technology of
artificial intelligence that is capable of creating content such as
text, audio, image or video based on patterns learned from large
volumes of data rather than being explicitly programmed with
rules.
(d) “Synthetic media” means an image, audio recording or
video recording of the appearance, speech or conduct of a person
that has been intentionally manipulated with the use of generative
adversarial network techniques, artificial intelligence, generative
artificial intelligence or any other digital technology to create a
realistic but false image, audio recording or video recording that
produces:
(1) A depiction that to a reasonable natural person is of a
real natural person in appearance, action or speech but that did
not actually occur in reality; and
(2) A fundamentally different understanding or impression
of the appearance, action or speech of a person than what a
reasonable natural person would have from viewing or listening to
the unaltered original version of the image, audio recording or
video recording.
-
*AB271*

– 5 –
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any preparatory administrative tasks that
are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB271*